South Dakota, session 2026, HB1160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34-20G-92 be REPEALED.
The Executive Board of the Legislative Research Council shall appoint an oversight
committee consisting of:
(1) Two members of the Senate;
(2) Two members of the House of Representatives;
(3) One physician licensed in accordance with chapter 36-4;
(4) One physician assistant licensed in accordance with chapter 36-4A;
(5) One certified nurse practitioner licensed in accordance with chapter 36-9A;
(6) One chief of police for a municipality having a population in excess of fifty-
thousand, or a representative of the police department designated by the chief;
(7) One sheriff of a county or a representative of the sheriff's office designated by the
sheriff;
(8) One professional counselor licensed in accordance with chapter 36-32 or one
addiction counselor licensed in accordance with chapter 36-34; and
(9) One qualifying patient.
Each appointee shall serve for a term of two years and may be reappointed.
Section 2. That § 34-20G-92.1 be REPEALED.
Beginning in 2023, and every two years thereafter, the oversight committee shall
select from among itself one legislator to serve as the chair and one legislator, from the
opposite chamber, to serve as the vice chair.
Beginning in 2025, the legislators selected to serve as the chair and vice chair may
not be from the same chamber as their immediate predecessors.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.883.10 2 1160
Section 3. That § 34-20G-93 be REPEALED.
The oversight committee shall meet at least two times per year for the purpose of
evaluating and making recommendations to the Legislature and the department
regarding:
(1) The ability of qualifying patients in all areas of the state to obtain timely access to
high-quality medical cannabis;
(2) The effectiveness of the dispensaries and cultivation facilities, individually and
together, in serving the needs of qualifying patients, including the provision of
educational and support services by dispensaries, the reasonableness of their
prices, whether they are generating any complaints or security problems, and the
sufficiency of the number operating to serve the state's registered qualifying
patients;
(3) The effectiveness of the cannabis testing facilities, including whether a sufficient
number are operating;
(4) The sufficiency of the regulatory and security safeguards contained in this chapter
and adopted by the department to ensure that access to and use of cannabis
cultivated is provided only to cardholders;
(5) Any recommended additions or revisions to the department regulations or this
chapter, including recommendations relating to security, safe handling, labeling,
and nomenclature;
(6) Any research studies regarding health effects of medical cannabis for patients; and
(7) Any medical and clinical aspects of the medical cannabis program.
The oversight committee shall ensure that it seeks relevant input from qualifying
patients; designated caregivers; pharmacists; school boards and administrators; parents;
municipal representatives; state agencies, including the Department of Health, the South
Dakota Division of Criminal Investigation, and the Department of Public Safety; and
medical cannabis establishments.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.